Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-917
Delivery of services; cooperation;
coordination of programs.

The delivery of all services provided
for under the Protection from Domestic Abuse Act shall be done in cooperation
with existing public, private, state, and local programs whenever possible
to avoid duplication of services. Special effort shall be taken to coordinate
programs with the Department of Labor, the State Department
of Education, the Department of Health and Human Services, and other appropriate agencies, community service
agencies, and private sources.

Laws 1978, LB 623, § 17;

Laws 1980, LB 684, § 17;

Laws 1995, LB 275, § 2;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 104;

Laws 2004, LB 1083, § 90;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 61;

Laws 2009, LB154, § 8.